Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-311 Notice of annual meeting.
(a) Notice of the time and place of the annual meeting of members of a
domestic mutual insurer shall be given by imprinting the notice plainly on the
policies issued by the insurer.

(b) Any change of the date or place of the
annual meeting shall be made only at an annual meeting of members. Notice of
the change may be given:

(1) By imprinting the new date or place on all
policies which will be in effect as of the date of such changed meeting; or

(2) Unless the commissioner otherwise orders:

(A) Through policies issued after the date of
the annual meeting at which such change was made, and

(B) In or attached to premium notices and
renewal certificates issued during the twenty-four months immediately following
the meeting. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next